South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4645.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-1-325.  Notwithstanding another provision of law to the contrary, including any provision in Chapter 55, Title 44, or in Titles 5 or 6, the Department of Environmental Services shall not permit the construction or installation of septic tanks within two hundred yards of any navigable waterway or coastal wetland within the State. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----